Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201515-709
Streets; improvements; utility service connections; duty of landowner; special assessment.

The city council may order the owner of lots abutting on a street that is to be paved to lay sewer, gas, and water service pipes to connect mains. If the owner fails to lay such pipes, after five days' notice by publication in a newspaper of general circulation in the city, or in place thereof by personal service of such notice, as the council in its discretion may direct, the council may cause the sewer, gas, and water service pipes to be laid as part of the work of the improvement district and assess the cost thereof on the property of such owner as a special assessment. Such assessment to pay the cost of the pavement or improvements in the improvement district shall be collected and enforced as a special assessment.

Laws 1901, c. 16, § 97, p. 106;

Laws 1905, c. 16, § 9, p. 209;

Laws 1913, c. 5, p 4, p. 61;

R.S.1913, § 4524;

Laws 1915, c. 82, § 1, p. 209;

Laws 1917, c. 94, § 1, p. 250;

C.S.1922, § 3910;

C.S.1929, § 15-703;

R.S.1943, § 15-709;

Laws 2015, LB361, § 14.
August 30, 2015